test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kosima87_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kosima: # Verb (87) kosima 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kosima+V+Inf/mA: kosima
     kosima+V+Inf: kossiq
     kosima+V+Act+PrfPrc: kosinuq
     kosima+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [kosit, kositu]

     kosima+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kosi
     kosima+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [kosit, kosidõq]
     kosima+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [kosi, kosis]
     kosima+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kosimiq
     kosima+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kositiq
     kosima+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [kosivaq, kosisõq]
     kosima+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: kosi
     kosima+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [kosõ, kosisi]
     kosima+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kosõt, kosõq, kosõdõq, kosisit, kosisiq, kosisidõq]
     kosima+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [kosõ, kosisi]
     kosima+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kosõmiq, kosisimiq]
     kosima+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kosõtiq, kosisitiq]
     kosima+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kosõq, kosõvaq, kosisiq, kosisivaq]

     kosima+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kosida
     kosima+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kositas

     kosima+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kossiv

     kosima+V+Jus: kosiguq
